dictsource/lb_rules
// espeak-ng
// lb_rules
// created by Marco Barnig  mbarnig@pt.lu
// 15.9.2018
// 
// Lëtzebuergesch
//

.group a
	a	aː


.group b
	b	b


.group c
	ch	ɕ


.group d
	d	d


.group e
	e	eː


.group f
	f	f


.group g
	g	g


.group h
	h	h


.group i
	i	iː


.group j
	j	ʒ


.group k
	k	k


.group l
	l	l


.group m
	m	m


.group n
	n	n


.group o
	o	oː


.group p
	p	p


.group q
	q	kw


.group r
	r	ʀ


.group s
	s	s


.group t
	t	t


.group u
	u	uː


.group v
	v	v


.group w
	w	v


.group x
	x	ks


.group y
	y	i


.group z
	z	ʦ
